Hawaii statutes.
[§431:30-106] Membership; voting; bylaws. (a)
Each compacting state shall have and be limited to one member. Each member
shall be qualified to serve in such capacity under or pursuant to the
applicable law of the compacting state. Any member may be removed or suspended
from office as provided by the law of the state from which the member is
appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the commission shall be filled in
accordance with the laws of the compacting state wherein such vacancy exists.
Nothing herein shall be construed to affect the manner in which a compacting
state determines the election or appointment and qualification of its own
commissioner.

(b) Each member shall be entitled to one vote
and shall have an opportunity to participate in the governance of the
commission in accordance with the bylaws. Notwithstanding any provision herein
to the contrary, no action of the commission with respect to the adoption of a
uniform standard shall be effective unless two-thirds of the members vote in
favor thereof.

(c) The commission, by a majority of the
members, shall prescribe bylaws to govern its conduct as may be necessary or
appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of the compact,
including but not limited to:

(1) Establishing the fiscal year of the commission;

(2) Providing reasonable procedures for appointing
and electing members, as well as holding meetings, of the management committee;

(3) Providing reasonable
standards and procedures for the establishment and meetings of other
committees, and governing any general or specific delegation of any authority
or function of the commission;

(4) Providing reasonable
procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the commission that consist
of a majority of commission members, ensuring reasonable advance notice of each
such meeting, and providing for the right of citizens to attend each such
meeting with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public's interest,
the privacy of individuals, and insurers' proprietary information, including
trade secrets. The commission may meet in camera only after a majority of the
entire membership votes to close a meeting in toto or in part.
As soon as practicable, the commission shall make public a copy of the vote to
close the meeting revealing the vote of each member with no proxy votes
allowed, and votes taken during such meeting;

(5) Establishing the
titles, duties, and authority, and reasonable procedures for the election, of
the officers of the commission;

(6) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for
the establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the commission.
Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any compacting
state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs
of the commission;

(7) Adopting a code of ethics to address permissible
and prohibited activities of commission members and employees; and

(8) Providing a mechanism for winding up the
operations of the commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds
that may exist after the termination of the compact after the payment or
reserving of all of its debts and obligations.

(d) The commission shall publish its bylaws in
a convenient form and file a copy thereof and a copy of any amendment thereto,
with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the compacting states. [L
2004, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next